Utah statutes.
76-10-1106.   Duty of prosecuting attorney or law enforcement officer to prosecute offenses.

All prosecuting attorneys,  sheriffs, constables, and  peace officers who have reasonable cause to believe any person has violated any provisions of this part shall diligently prosecute those persons.

